src/ruleset/rules.foma
#The transducer rules!
source functions.foma

#3.1: remove silent stuff
define RemoveSilent         WithAnt("\si", ?*) -> 0;
define Phase31 RemoveSilent;

#3.2: Separate segments with spaces /stress symbols
define StressT(S)               " " S " ";
define TransformApostrophe      "'" -> "-" || _ \AnyAntR(r);
define SplitUnstressed          ["-" | EAnt("\se")] -> StressT("-");
define SplitLeftPrimaryStress   EAnt("\sel") -> StressT("<-");
define SplitRightPrimaryStress  EAnt("\ser") -> StressT("->");
define SplitLeftSecondaryStress EAnt("\selr") -> StressT("<<-");
define SplitRightSecondaryStress EAnt("\serl") -> StressT("->>");

#Wire it together in parallel
define SplitSegments            TransformApostrophe .o. [SplitUnstressed .o. SplitLeftPrimaryStress
                                .o. SplitRightPrimaryStress .o. SplitLeftSecondaryStress .o. SplitRightSecondaryStress];
define Phase32 SplitSegments;

#3.3: Apply critical digraphs
#first: ng -> \co{n} if not followed by l or r
define NgReplace1   "n" "g"     -> WithAnt("\co", "n")  || NotInAntL _ [SegBoundary | AnyAntR([EarlyConsonant & \"l" & \"r"])];
#next: ng -> nj if followed by e, i or y
define NgReplace2   "n" "g"     -> "n" "j"              || NotInAntL _ AnyAntR(["e"|"i"|"y"]);
#next: ng -> \co{ng} in all other cases
define NgReplace3   "n" "g"     -> WithAnt("\co", "n") WithAnt("\co", "g") || NotInAntL _;
#when ng is n\co{g}, alwyas \co{n} \co{g}.
#Don't need to check for being in an annotation cos that would imply a nested annotation
define NgReplace4   "n" WithAnt("\co", "g") -> WithAnt("\co", "n") WithAnt("\co", "g");

#Order is important here, NgReplace3 traps cases that fall through NgReplace2
define NgReplace NgReplace1 .o. NgReplace2 .o. NgReplace3 .o. NgReplace4;

#OK, let's do gh
#gh is silent everywhere
define GhReplace1   "g" "h"     -> 0 || NotInAntL _;
#\opq{gh} says should be schwa, but Jose reckons try a
define GhReplace2   WithAnt("\opq", "g" "h") -> "a";
define GhReplace GhReplace1 .o. GhReplace2;

#wh:
#wh becomes \co{w} at begining of seg or when followed by consonant
define WhReplace1   "w" "h" @-> WithAnt("\co", "w") || SegBoundary _;
define WhReplace2   "w" "h" @-> WithAnt("\co", "w") || AnyAntL(EarlyConsonant) _ NotInAntR; #left is used for the consonant, so verify no trailing }
define WhReplace WhReplace1 ,, WhReplace2;

#wr:
#wr becomes r except after vowel
#Since we have a not rule rather than a yes rule, need to consider end-of-segment
define WrReplace    "w" "r" -> "r" || [\AnyAntL(EarlyVowel) | SegBoundary] _ NotInAntR;

#qu -> kw before aeiouy
define QuReplace    "q" "u" -> "k" "w" || NotInAntL _ AnyAntR([EarlyVowel | "y"]);

#gu:
#gu -> \co{g}w before aou
#I imply that \co{g}u should also be included here
define GuReplace1   ["g"|WithAnt("\co", "g")]  "u" @-> WithAnt("\co", "g") "w" || NotInAntL _ AnyAntR(["a"|"o"|"u"]);
#gu -> \co{g} before eiy
define GuReplace2   ["g"|WithAnt("\co", "g")] "u" @-> WithAnt("\co", "g") || NotInAntL _ AnyAntR(["e"|"i"|"y"]);

define GuReplace GuReplace1 ,, GuReplace2;

#ah etc
#h is silent between a vowel and a consonant
define AhReplace    "h" -> 0 || AnyAntL([EarlyVowel|"y"|"w"]) _ AnyAntR(EarlyConsonant);

#wire everything up together!
define Phase33 NgReplace .o. GhReplace .o. WhReplace .o. WrReplace .o. QuReplace .o. GuReplace .o. AhReplace;
